apertium-kir.kir-seg.twol
Alphabet
 А Б В Г Д Е Ё Ж З И И К Л М Н Ң О Ө П Р С Т У Ү Ф Х Ц Ч Ш Щ Ь Ы Ъ Э Ю Я
 а б в г д е ё ж з и й к л м н ң о ө п р с т у ү ф х ц ч ш щ ь ы ъ э ю я
 A B C D E F G H I J K L M N O P Q R S T U V W X Y Z
 a b c d e f g h i j k l m n o p q r s t u v w x y z
 %0 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9
 %{G%}:г %{D%}:д %{Д%}:д %{N%}:н %{L%}:л %{B%}:б %{P%}:п %{s%}:с %{n%}:н %{l%}:л
 %{A%}:а %{I%}:ы %{U%}:у %{E%}:а %{e%}:0 %{K%}:к %{y%}:0
 %{а%}:0 %{э%}:0 %{ү%}:0 %{у%}:0 %{о%}:0
 %{й%}:0 %{л%}:0 %{з%}:0 %{т%}:0
 %{і%}:и
 %{redC%}:0 %{redV%}:0
 M C L X V I
 ° %% %, %. %- %>:%> % 
 ; 

Sets

!%{G%}       ! Realised as 'г', 'к', 'ң', 'н'
!%{K%}       ! Realised as 'г', 'к'
!%{D%}       ! Realised as 'д', 'т', 'н'
!%{N%}       ! Realised as 'н', 'д', 'т'
!%{L%}       ! Realised as 'л', 'д', 'т'

Cns = Б В Г Д Ж З Й К Л М Н Ң П Р С Т Ф Х Ц Ч Ш Щ Ь Ъ 
      б в г д ж з й к л м н ң п р с т ф х ц ч ш щ ь ъ 
      B C D F G H J K L M N P Q R S T V W X Y Z
      b c d f g h j k l m n p q r s t v w x y z
      %{D%} %{G%} %{N%} %{L%} %{B%} %{s%} %{n%} %{l%} %{K%} ;
      !%{D%} %{G%} %{N%} %{L%} %{B%} %{P%} %{s%} %{n%} ;

SurCns = Б В Г Д Ж З Й К Л М Н Ң П Р С Т Ф Х Ц Ч Ш Щ Ь Ъ 
         б в г д ж з й к л м н ң п р с т ф х ц ч ш щ ь ъ
         B C D F G H J K L M N P Q R S T V W X Y Z
         b c d f g h j k l m n p q r s t v w x y z
       ;

FromCns = SurCns Я я Ё ё Ю ю ;

!%{E%}       ! Realised as 'а', 'е', 'о', 'ө', 'й' 
!%{A%}       ! Realised as 'а', 'е', 'о', 'ө' 
!%{I%}       ! Realised as 'ы', 'и', 'у', 'ү'
!%{U%}       ! Realised as 'у', 'ү'
!%{y%}       ! Realised as '', 'ы', 'и', 'у', 'ү'

Vow =     А Е Ё И О Ө У Ү Ы Э Ю Я
          а е ё и о ө у ү ы э ю я 
          %{A%} %{I%} %{U%} %{E%} %{y%}
          %{а%} %{э%} %{ү%} %{у%} %{о%} ;

SurVow = А Е Ё И О Ө У Ү Ы Э Ю Я
         а е ё и о ө у ү ы э ю я ; 

FrontVow = И Ө Е Ү Э и ө ү э е %{э%} %{ү%} I i E e ;  ! I V L C M ;
BackVow = А О У Ы а о у ы Я я Ю ю %{а%} %{у%} %{о%} A a O o U u ; ! X ;
FrontUnrndVow = И Е Э и э е %{э%} I i E e ; 
BackUnrndVow = А Ы а ы Я я A a ;
FrontRndVow = Ө Ү ө ү %{ү%} ;
BackRndVow =  О У о у Ю ю Ё ё %{о%} %{у%} O o U u ;
BackLowRndVow = О о Ё ё %{о%} O o ;
LowVow = Е е Э э Ө ө А а Я я О о Ё ё A a O o E e ;
HighVow = И и Ү ү Ы ы У у Ю ю %{у%} I i U u ;
YotVow = Я я Е е Ё ё Ю ю ;

!! For Kazakh:
!RealVow = І Ү Е Ө Ә А О Ы Ұ
!          і ү е ө ә а о ы ұ ;
!AmbigVow = И У
!           и у ;

NasalCns = м н ң
           М Н Ң
           M N
           m n
         ;

LabialCns = б п м
            Б П М
            b p m
            B P M
          ;

UnvoicedNonSonCns = К П С Т Ф Х Ц Ч Ш Щ  
	                 к п с т ф х ц ч ш щ
                    C F H K P Q S T X
                    c f h k p q s t x
                  ;

VoicedCns = Б В Г Д Ж З Л М Н Ң Й Р
            б в г д ж з л м н ң й р
            B D G J L M N R V W Y Z
            b d g j l m n r v w y z
          ;

VoicedObs = Б В Г Д Ж З 
            б в г д ж з
            B D G J V Z
            b d g j v z
          ;

VoicedLowSonCns = Б В Г Д Ж З Л М Н Ң
                  б в г д ж з л м н ң
                  B D G J L M N R V Z
                  b d g j l m n r v z           
                ;

! These three sets include the suffix border, and accounts for long-distance VH
CnsFrontUnrndVowSB = Cns FrontUnrndVow %> ;
CnsFrontRndVowSB = Cns FrontRndVow %> ;
CnsBackRndVowSB = Cns BackRndVow %> ;

! These sets do not continue suffix borders.
CnsFrontUnrndVow = Cns FrontUnrndVow %{I%} %{A%} %{U%} %{E%} ;
CnsFrontRndVow = Cns FrontRndVow  %{I%} %{A%} %{U%} %{E%} ;
CnsBackRndVow = Cns BackRndVow  %{I%} %{A%} %{U%} %{E%} ;
CnsBackLowRndVow = Cns BackLowRndVow  %{I%} %{A%} %{U%} %{E%} ;

NotVowel = Cns %> ; 

Wild = Cns SurVowel %> 0 ;
WildNoVow = Cns %> 0 ;
WildNonPhon = %> 0 ;
!WildNoVowNoY = [ Cns - й ] %> 0 ;

Abstract = %{а%} %{э%} %{ү%} %{у%} %{о%} %{й%} %{л%} %{з%} %{т%} ;
AbstractVow = %{а%} %{э%} %{ү%} %{у%} %{о%} ;
AbstractCns = %{й%} %{л%} %{з%} %{т%} ;


Rules

!!!!!!!!!!!!!   Rules that work and don't bother anything !!!!!!!!!!!

"Soft sign deletion before suffix"
ь:0 <=> _ %>: ;

"/n/ deletion in px3 nominative"
%{n%}:0 <=> _ .#. ;

"{E} turns to й after a vowel"
%{E%}:й <=> :SurVow %>: _ ;

"L Desonorisation"
%{L%}:д <=> :VoicedLowSonCns/[ %>: | [ :0 - AbstractCns: ] ] _ ;
            [ %{л%}:0 | %{з%}:0 ] %>: _ ;

"N Desonorisation"
%{N%}:д <=> [ :VoicedCns - %{n%}:н ]/[ %>: | [ [ :0 | %-: ] - [ Abstract: | %{n%}: ] ] ] _ ;
            [ %{й%}:0 | %{л%}:0 | %{з%}:0 ]/[ %>: | %-: | [ :0 - [ Abstract: | %{n%}: ] ] ] _ ;
!%{N%}:д <=> VoicedCns (%>:) _ ;

!!!!!! рн stuff !!!!! 

"Unepenthesis between stem-final consonants that can't be a coda cluster"
%{y%}:0 <=> _ [ :Cns :SurVow ]/[ :0 | %>: | %-: ] ;

! FIXME: check
"Harmony of epenthesised vowel between stem-final consonants that can't be a coda cluster"
!%{y%}:Vy <=> [ :LastVowel :Cns* :Cns ]/[:0] _ [ :Cns \:SurVow ]/[ :0 | %>:] ;
%{y%}:Vy <=> [ :LastVowel :Cns* [ :Cns - й: ] ]/[ :0 - й: ] _ [ :Cns [ .#. | :Cns ] ]/[ :0 | %-: | %>: ] ;
  where  Vy  in  (  и  ү  и  и  ү  ы  ы  у  у  ы  у  у )
  LastVowel  in  (  и  ү  е  э  ө  я  а  ё  о  ы  ю  у )
           matched ;

! FIXME: check
"Harmony of epenthesised vowel between stem-final consonants that can't be a coda cluster after й"
!%{y%}:Vy <=> [ :LastVowel :Cns* :Cns ]/[:0] _ [ :Cns \:SurVow ]/[ :0 | %>:] ;
%{y%}:Vy <=> [ :LastVowel :Cns* й: ]/[ :0 - й: ] _ [ :Cns [ .#. | :Cns ] ]/[ :0 | %-: | %>: ] ;
  where  Vy  in  (  и  ү  и  и  ү  ы  ы  ю  ю  ы  ю  ю )
  LastVowel  in  (  и  ү  е  э  ө  я  а  ё  о  ы  ю  у )
           matched ;

"Desonorisation of н when no vowel epenthesised"
н:д <=> :р %{y%}:0 _ ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!   Rules that might be messing with me !!!!!!!!!!!!!

"Devoicing of stops etc. across morpheme boundary after voiceless consonants" !!"Katkalan harmony in consonants"
Cx:Cy <=>  [ :UnvoicedNonSonCns ]/[ [ :0 - [ %{n%}:0 | Abstract:0 ] ] | %-: | %>: ] _ ;
           [ %{т%}:0 ]/[ %>: | %-: ] _ ;
                           except
                                   ! avoid conflict with "Causative stuff"
                                   [ :SurVow | :р | :н ] %>: _ %{I%}: р: ;
        where Cx in ( %{B%}  %{G%}  %{Д%}  %{D%}  %{L%}  %{N%} )
              Cy in (   п      к      т      т      т      т   )
              matched;


!!!!!!!!!!!!   Consonant stuff  !!!!!!!!!!!!!

"Intervocalic voicing of п"
п:б <=> :SurVow (:0) _ %>: (:0) :SurVow ;
     except
             ! avoid conflict with "{I}п stuff"
             :LowVow _ %>: %{I%}: п ;

"Intervocalic voicing of к"
к:г <=> :SurVow (:0) _ %>: (:0) :SurVow ;

! {K} surfaces as [к] everywhere except after voiced obstruents (/з/) and vowels
"Voicing of {K}"
%{K%}:г <=> [ :SurVow | :VoicedObs ] (:0) %>: _ (:0) :SurVow ;


!!!!!!!!!!!!   Deletion   !!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

"Deletion of {I} after vowels"
%{I%}:0 <=> [ :SurVow ]/[ [ :0 - Abstract: ] | %-: | %>: ] _ ;
      except
                    й:0/[ %>: | [ :0 - Abstract: ] ] _ ;    ! Avoid conflict w y-vowels
                              :LowVow LabialCns: %>: _ п ;  ! Avoid conflict with {I}п stuff

"Deletion of {I} after {n}"
%{I%}:0 <=> %{n%}:н/[ [ :0 - Abstract: ] | %>: ] _ ;
      except
   [ %{e%}: :Cns* ]/[ [ :0 - Abstract: ] | %>: | %-: ] _ ;        ! Avoid conflict w irreg vowel harm

"Deletion of {A} after vowels"
%{A%}:0 <=> [ :SurVow ]/[ [ :0 - Abstract: ] | %-: | %>: ] _ ;
         except
                 %{A%}:/[ :0 | %>: ] _ ;    ! Avoid conflict with ??? FIXME
                     й:/[ :0 | %>: ] _ ;    ! Avoid conflict w y-vowels

"Deletion of {s} after a consonant"
!%{s%}:0 <=> [ :Cns | й: | ь:0 ]/[ %>: ]* _ ;
%{s%}:0 <=> [ AbstractCns: | :Cns | й: ]/[ %>: | %-: | [ :0 - Abstract: ] ]* _ ;
        except
            AbstractVow:/[ [ :0 - Abstract: ] | %-: ]* _ ;

"Deletion of {і} at end of word (i.e., in stand-alone forms)"
%{і%}:0 <=> _ .#. ;


!!!!!!!!!!!!   Vowel harmony !!!!!!!!!!!!!

"Vowel harmony for archiphoneme {A}"
%{A%}:Vy  <=> [ :LastVowel :Cns* :Cns ]/[ [ :0 - [ Abstract:0 ] ] | %>: | %-: ] _ ;
                                 [ %{A%}:LastVowel ] _ ;
                 except
                                                     _ ( %>: ) %{U%}: ;
                          :LastVowel й:/[ :0 | %>: ] _ ;

                            [ %{e%}: :Cns* ]/[ %>: | %-: ] _ ;    ! Avoid conflict with irregular vowel harmony
!                                                     _ %{A%}: ; ! so that AA = ээ, not ее
!                                              %{A%}: _ ; ! so that AA = ээ, not ее
        [ [ :и | :е | :э ] :Cns* :Cns ]/[ :0 | %>: ] _ %{A%}: ;
                                             %{A%}:э _ ; 
        where LastVowel in (  и  ү  е  э  ө  я  а  ё  о  ы  ю  у  О  A  a  E  e  I  i  O  o  U  u )
                     Vy in (  е  ө  е  е  ө  а  а  о  о  а  а  а  о  а  а  е  е  е  е  о  о  а  а )
!        where LastVowel in (  ү  ө  я  а  ё  о  ы  ю  у  )
!                     Vy in (  ө  ө  а  а  о  о  а  а  а  )

                     matched ;

"Abstract vowel harmony for {А} after {а} or {у}"
%{A%}:а  <=> [ [ %{а%}:0 | %{у%}:0 ] AbstractCns:0* :Cns* ]/[ [ :0 - Abstract: ] | %>: | %-: ] _ ;
         except
             _ ( %>: ) [ %{U%}: - :YotVow ] ;


"Abstract vowel harmony for {А} after {э}"
%{A%}:е  <=> [ %{э%}:0 AbstractCns:0* :Cns* ]/[ [ :0 - Abstract: ] | %>: | %-: ] _ ;
         except
             _ ( %>: ) [ %{U%}: - :YotVow ] ;


"Abstract vowel harmony for {А} after {ү}"
%{A%}:ө  <=> [ %{ү%}:0 AbstractCns:0* :Cns* ]/[ [ :0 - Abstract: ] | %>: | %-: ] _ ;
         except
             _ ( %>: ) [ %{U%}: - :YotVow ] ;

"Abstract vowel harmony for {А} before {U} after {ү} and {э}"
%{A%}:ө  <=> [ %{ү%}:0 AbstractCns:0* :Cns* ]/[ [ :0 - Abstract: ] | %>: | %-: ] _ ( %>: ) [ %{U%}: - :YotVow ] ;
             [ %{э%}:0 AbstractCns:0* :Cns* ]/[ [ :0 - Abstract: ] | %>: | %-: ] _ ( %>: ) [ %{U%}: - :YotVow ] ;

"Abstract vowel harmony for {А} after {о}"
%{A%}:о  <=> [ %{о%}:0 AbstractCns:0* :Cns* ]/[ [ :0 - Abstract: ] | %>: | %-: ] _ ;
         except
             _ ( %>: ) [ %{U%}: - :YotVow ] ;

"Abstract vowel harmony for {A} before {U} after {o} and {a}"
%{A%}:о  <=> [ %{о%}:0 AbstractCns:0* :Cns* ]/[ [ :0 - Abstract: ] | %>: | %-: ] _ ( %>: ) [ %{U%}: - :YotVow ] ;
             [ %{а%}:0 AbstractCns:0* :Cns* ]/[ [ :0 - Abstract: ] | %>: | %-: ] _ ( %>: ) [ %{U%}: - :YotVow ] ;


"Vowel harmony for {A} so that AA becomes ээ"  ! and not ее
%{A%}:э <=> [ :LastVowel :Cns* :Cns ]/[ [ :0 - Abstract: ] | %>: ] _ %{A%}: ;
                 except
!                                                     _ ( %>: ) %{U%}: ;
                          :LastVowel й:/[ :0 | %>: ] _ ;
!                            [ %{e%}: :Cns* ]/[ %>: ] _ ;    ! Avoid conflict with irregular vowel harmony
        where LastVowel in (  и  е  э  ) ;
! тез>{I}р{A}{A}к:тезирээк

"Vowel harmony for {A} so that AA becomes ээ part 2"
%{A%}:э <=> %{A%}:э _ ;
            except
                    _ %{A%}: ;

"Vowel harmony for archiphoneme {I}"
%{I%}:Vy <=> [ :LastVowel :Cns* :Cns ]/[ %>: | %-: | [ :0 - Abstract:0 ] ] _ ;
              except
                        [ :LowVow м: ]/[ :0 | %>: ] _ п/[ :0 | %>: ] ;
                                %{n%}:/[ :0 | %>: ] _ ;     ! Avoid conflict with {n} stuff
                                    й:/[ :0 | %>: ] _ ;     ! Avoid conflict w y-vowels
                     [ %{e%}: :Cns* ]/[ %>: | %-: ] _ ;     ! Avoid conflict with irregular vowel harmony
                                                    _ р:0 ; ! Avoid conflict w causative
  where  Vy  in  (  и  ү  и  и  ү  ы  ы  у  у  ы  у  у  и  ү  ү  ы  у  ы  у  ы  ы  и  и  и  и  у  у  у  у )
  LastVowel  in  (  и  ү  е  э  ө  я  а  ё  о  ы  ю  у  И  Ү  Ө  А  О  Ы  У  A  a  E  e  I  i  O  o  U  u )
           matched ;
